ko: 양념 형태: 크림; 페이스트; 파우더; 소스; 스프레드; 기타
da: Krydderiform: Creme; Pasta; Pulver; Sauce; Smørepålæg; Anden
cs: Forma dochucovadla: Krém; Pasta; Prášek; Omáčka; Pomazánka; Jiné
sv: Kondimentform: Kräm; Pasta; Pulver; Sås; Bredbart pålägg; Annan
sk-SK: Forma ochucovadla: Krém; Pasta; Prášok; Omáčka; Nátierka; Iné
hr-HR: Oblik začina: Krema; Pasta; Prah; Umak; Namaz; Ostalo
el: Μορφή καρυκεύματος: Κρέμα; Πάστα; Σκόνη; Σάλτσα; Άλειμμα; Άλλο
zh-CN: 调味品形式: 膏状; 酱状; 粉状; 酱汁; 涂抹酱; 其他
nl: Specerij vorm: Crème; Pasta; Poeder; Saus; Spread; Overig
es: Forma de condimento: Crema; Pasta; Polvo; Salsa; Para untar; Otro
ja: 調味料の形状: クリーム; ペースト; パウダー; ソース; スプレッド; その他
pt-PT: Forma de condimento: Creme; Pasta; Pó; Molho; Creme para barrar; Outra
ru: Форма приправы: Крем; Паста; Порошок; Соус; Спред; Другое
it: Forma di condimento: Crema; Pasta; Polvere; Salsa; Spalmabile; Altro
de: Form des Würzmittels: Creme; Paste; Pulver; Sauce; Aufstrich; Sonstige
tr: Çeşni formu: Krema; Ezme; Toz; Sos; Sürülebilir; Diğer
fi: Höysteen tai mausteen muoto: Kreemi; Tahna; Jauhe; Kastike; Levite; Muu
en: Condiment form: Cream; Paste; Powder; Sauce; Spread; Other
hu: Fűszer formátuma: Krém; Paszta; Por; Szósz; Kenhető krém; Egyéb
pt-BR: Forma de condimento: Creme; Pasta; Pó; Molho; Para passar; Outro
zh-TW: 調味品形式: 乳狀; 膏狀; 粉狀; 醬狀; 抹醬; 其他
pl: Forma przyprawy/sosu: Krem; Pasta; Proszek; Sos; Pasta do smarowania; Inna
bg-BG: Форма за подправки: Крем; Паста; Прах; Сос; За мазане; Друга
fr: Forme de condiment: Crème; Pâte; Poudre; Sauce; À tartiner; Autre
nb: Krydderform: Krem; Pasta; Pulver; Saus; Pålegg; Annet
ro-RO: Formă de condiment: Cremă; Pastă; Pudră; Sos; Pastă tartinabilă; Altele
sl-SI: Oblika začimb: Krema; Pasta; Prah; Omaka; Namaz; Drugo
lt-LT: Pagardo forma: Kremas; Pasta; Milteliai; Padažas; Užtepas; Kita
th: รูปแบบเครื่องปรุงรส: ครีม; เพสต์; ผง; ซอส; สเปรด; อื่นๆ
vi: Dạng gia vị: Kem; Đặc sệt; Bột; Nước sốt; Đồ phết; Khác